test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhiminaanibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiminaanibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhiminaanibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhiminiibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiminiibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhiminiibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiminaanibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiminaanibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiminaanibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiminiibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiminiibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiminiibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensimiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensimiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensimiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhishinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhishinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhishinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhishiniibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhishiniibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhishiniibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhishini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhishiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhishiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhishiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensishinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensishinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensishinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensishiniibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensishiniibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensishiniibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensishini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensishini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensishini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensishiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensishiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensishiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodimishinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodimishinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodimishinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodimishiniibaning
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodimishiniibanan
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodimishiniibanag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodimishini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodimishini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodimishini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodimishiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodimishiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodimishiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimashkimodenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimashkimodenhimishiniiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimashkimodensimishinaaniban
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimashkimodensimishiniiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimashkimodensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimashkimodenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimashkimodenhimishiniiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimashkimodenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimashkimodensimishinaaniban
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimashkimodensimishiniiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimashkimodensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omashkimodenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omashkimodenhimishiniiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omashkimodenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omashkimodensimishinaaniban
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omashkimodensimishiniiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omashkimodensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imashkimodenhimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imashkimodenhimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imashkimodenhimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imashkimodensimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imashkimodensimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imashkimodensimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishinaaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishinaanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishinaanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishiniing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishinian
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishiniag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishinaaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimashkimodensimishinaanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimashkimodensimishiniing
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimashkimodensimishinian
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimashkimodensimishiniag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishiwaaing
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimashkimodensimishiwaaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishiwaaag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishinaaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishinaanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishinaanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishiniing
